Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Part 2
Provisions Applicable to Mortgage Brokers and Mortgage Lenders

§ 26-31-201. Definitions.

As used in this part and in rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter and pertinent to this part:

“Agent” means a person who acts with the consent and on behalf of a licensee and is subject to the licensee’s direct or indirect control and may include an independent contractor.

“Loan modification” means an adjustment or compromise of an existing residential mortgage loan. The term “loan modification” does not include a refinancing transaction.

“Loan modification activities” means, for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain, engaging in or offering to engage in effecting loan modifications in this state. The definition of “debt counselor” or “credit counselor” in section 26-2222(9), Idaho Code, shall not apply to loan modification activities.

“Mortgage broker” means any nonexempt organization that performs the activities described in subsection (5) of this section, with respect to a residential mortgage loan.

“Mortgage brokering activities” means, for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain, either directly or indirectly, accepting or offering to accept an application for a residential mortgage loan, assisting or offering to assist in the preparation of an application for a residential mortgage loan on behalf of a borrower, negotiating or offering to negotiate the terms or conditions of a residential mortgage loan with any person making residential mortgage loans, or engaging in loan modification activities on behalf of a borrower.

“Mortgage lender” means any nonexempt organization that makes residential mortgage loans to borrowers and performs the activities described in subsection (7) of this section.

“Mortgage lending activities” means, for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain, either directly or indirectly, accepting or offering to accept applications for residential mortgage loans, or assisting or offering to assist in the preparation of an application for a residential mortgage loan, or servicing a residential mortgage loan on behalf of any person.

“Servicing” means collecting payments of principal, interest, or any other payment obligations required pursuant to the terms of a residential mortgage loan.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-201, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 3, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 4, p. 260.

§ 26-31-202. Exemptions.

The provisions of this part do not apply to:

Agencies of the United States and agencies of this state and its political subdivisions;

An owner of real property who offers credit secured by a contract of sale, mortgage, or deed of trust on the property sold;

A loan that is made by a person to an employee of that person if the proceeds of the loan are used to assist the employee in meeting his housing needs;

Regulated lenders licensed under the Idaho credit code and regularly engaged in making regulated consumer loans other than those secured by a security interest in real property;

Trust companies as defined in section 26-3203, Idaho Code;

Any person licensed or chartered under the laws of any state or of the United States as a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or industrial loan company. The terms “bank,” “savings and loan association,” “credit union,” and “industrial loan company” shall include employees and agents of such organizations as well as wholly owned subsidiaries of such organizations, provided that the subsidiary is regularly examined by the chartering state or federal agency for consumer compliance purposes;

Attorneys duly authorized to practice in this state, to the extent that they are retained by their clients to engage in activities authorized by this part and such activities are ancillary to the attorney’s representation of the client;

Accountants with an active license under chapter 2, title 54, Idaho Code, provided that they are retained by their clients to engage in activities authorized by this part and such activities are ancillary to the representation of the client;

Persons employed by, or who contract with, a licensee under this part to perform only clerical or administrative functions on behalf of such licensee and who do not solicit borrowers or negotiate the terms of loans on behalf of the licensee;

Any person not making more than five (5) residential mortgage loans with his own funds for his own investment, in any period of twelve (12) consecutive months; or

Any person who funds a residential mortgage loan that has been originated and processed by a licensee under this part or by an exempt person under this part, who does not directly or indirectly solicit borrowers in this state for the purpose of making residential mortgage loans, and who does not participate in the negotiation of residential mortgage loans with the borrower. For the purpose of this subsection, “negotiation of residential mortgage loans” does not include setting the terms under which a person may buy or fund a residential mortgage loan originated by a licensee under this part or an exempt person under this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-202, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 4, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 5, p. 260.

§ 26-31-203. Unlawful acts.

Any person, except a person exempt under section 26-31-202, Idaho Code, who engages in mortgage brokering activities or mortgage lending activities without first obtaining a license from the department in accordance with this part, shall upon conviction be guilty of a felony.

No person, except a person exempt under section 26-31-202, Idaho Code, shall engage in mortgage brokering activities or mortgage lending activities without first obtaining a license from the department in accordance with this part.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-203, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-204. Powers and duties of director.

In addition to any other duties imposed upon the director by law, the director shall:

Administer and enforce the provisions and requirements of this part;

Conduct investigations and issue subpoenas as necessary to determine whether a person has violated any provision of this part or rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter and pertinent to this part;

Conduct examinations of the books and records of mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensees and conduct investigations as necessary and proper for the enforcement of the provisions of this part and the rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter and pertinent to this part;

Appoint a volunteer advisory board of up to five (5) individual mortgage industry participants who are licensed or registered through the NMLSR, no less than two (2) of whom represent licensed mortgage brokers and no less than two (2) of whom represent licensed mortgage lenders;

Pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, issue orders and promulgate rules that, in the opinion of the director, are necessary to execute, enforce and effectuate the purposes of this part;

Be authorized to set, by annual written notification to mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensees, limits on the fees and charges which are set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of section 26-31-210, Idaho Code; and

Review and approve forms used by mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensees prior to their use as prescribed by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-204, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 5, p. 142.

§ 26-31-205. Remedies available to the department.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person subject to this part has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of the truth in lending act, the real estate settlement procedures act, regulation X, regulation Z or of this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this act and pertinent to this part, he may in his discretion bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction, and upon a showing of any violation, there shall be granted any or all of the following:

A writ or order restraining or enjoining, temporarily or permanently, any act or practice violating any provision of this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part, and to enforce compliance with this part or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part;

An order that the person violating any provision of this part, or a rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part pay a civil penalty to the department in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation;

An order allowing the director to recover costs which may include investigative expenses and attorney’s fees;

An order granting a declaratory judgment that a particular act, practice or method is a violation of the provisions of this part;

An order granting other appropriate remedies including restitution to borrowers for excess charges or actual damages.

If the director finds that a person subject to this part has violated, is violating, or that there is reasonable cause to believe that a person is about to violate the provisions of this part, or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part, the director may, in his discretion, order the person to cease and desist from the violations.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-205, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-206. License to do business as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender.

The director shall receive and act on all applications for licenses to do business as a mortgage broker or mortgage lender. Applications shall be filed through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, shall contain such information as the director may reasonably require, shall be updated through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, as necessary to keep the information current and shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

An application for license may be denied if the director finds that:

The financial responsibility, character and fitness of the license applicant, or of the officers and directors thereof, if the applicant is a corporation, partners thereof if the applicant is a partnership, members or managers thereof if the applicant is a limited liability company and individuals designated in charge of the applicant’s places of business, or other control persons, are not such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated honestly and fairly within the purposes of this part;

The applicant or any control person of the applicant has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to any felony, or has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a misdemeanor involving any aspect of financial services, or a court has accepted a finding of guilt on the part of the applicant or any control person of the applicant of any felony, or of a misdemeanor involving any aspect of financial services, fraud, false statement or omission, any theft or wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses;

The applicant or any control person of the applicant has had a license to conduct financial services issued by a government agency revoked or suspended under the laws enforced by such agency;

The applicant or any control person of the applicant has filed an application for a license which is false or misleading with respect to any material fact;

The applicant or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, employee, agent or other control person of the applicant has violated this chapter or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part;

The applicant or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, employee, agent or other control person of the applicant has violated any state or federal law, rule or regulation pertaining to financial services; or

The applicant or any control person of the applicant has not provided information on the application as reasonably required by the director pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or has provided materially false information.

The director is empowered to conduct investigations, as he may deem necessary, to enable him to determine the existence of the requirements set out in subsection (2) of this section.

Upon written request to the director, an applicant is entitled to a hearing on the question of his qualifications for a license if:

The director has notified the applicant in writing that his application has been denied;
(b) The director has not issued a license within sixty (60) days after receipt of a complete license application from an applicant. If a hearing is held, the applicant shall reimburse, pro rata, the director for his reasonable and necessary expenses incurred as a result of the hearing. A request for hearing may not be made more than fifteen (15) days after the director has mailed a writing to the applicant notifying him that the application has been denied and stating in substance the director’s finding supporting denial of the application.

A license application shall be deemed withdrawn and void if an applicant submits an incomplete license application and, after receipt of a written notice of the application deficiency, fails to provide the director with information necessary to complete the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of the deficiency notice. A written deficiency notice shall be deemed received by a license applicant when:

Placed in regular U.S. mail by the director or his agent using an address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

E-mailed to the applicant using an e-mail address provided by the applicant on the license application; or

Posted by the director or his agent on the NMLSR.

Every licensee under this part shall maintain a home office located in the United States and licensed under this part as the licensee’s principal location for the transaction of mortgage business. The director may, on application through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, issue additional branch licenses to the same licensee upon compliance with all the provisions of this part governing the issuance of a single license. A separate license shall be required for each place of business from which mortgage brokering activities or mortgage lending activities are directly or indirectly conducted.

No licensee under this part shall change the location of any place of business, consolidate two (2) or more locations or close any home office location without giving the director at least fifteen (15) days’ prior written notice. A licensee under this part shall give written notice to the director within three (3) business days of the closure of any branch location licensed under this part. Written notice of the closure of a home or branch office location shall include a detailed explanation of the disposition of all loan applications pending at the time of closure of the licensed location.

No licensee under this part shall engage in the business of making or brokering residential mortgage loans at any place of business for which he does not hold a license nor shall he engage in business under any other name than that on the license.

The director may suspend action upon a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license application pending resolution of any criminal charges before any court of competent jurisdiction against an applicant which could disqualify that applicant if convicted.

The director may suspend action upon a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license application pending resolution of any civil action or administrative proceeding against an applicant in which the civil action or administrative proceeding involves any aspect of a financial service business and the outcome of which could disqualify the applicant.

A license applicant under this part shall make complete disclosure of all information required in the license application, including information concerning officers, directors, partners, members, managers, employees or agents. A license applicant, or person acting on behalf of the applicant, is not liable in any civil action other than a civil action brought by a governmental agency, related to an alleged untrue statement made pursuant to this part, unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that:
(a) The license applicant, or person acting on behalf of the license applicant, knew at the time that the statement was made that it was false in any material respect; or

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, an individual licensed under part 3 of this chapter may apply for a license under this section.

(b) The license applicant, or person acting on behalf of the applicant, acted in reckless disregard as to the statement’s truth or falsity.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-206, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 6, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 6, p. 260.

§ 26-31-207. Revocation or suspension of license.

If the department has reason to believe that grounds exist for revocation or suspension of a license issued pursuant to this part, the department may initiate a contested case against a mortgage broker or mortgage lender and any partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent whose activities constitute the basis for revocation or suspension, in accordance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The director may, after proceedings pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, suspend the license for a period not to exceed six (6) months, or revoke the license, if he finds that:

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent of the licensee has violated this chapter or any rule promulgated or order issued under this chapter and pertinent to this part; or

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent of the licensee has violated any state or federal law, rule or regulation pertaining to mortgage brokering, mortgage lending, or mortgage loan origination activities; or

Facts or conditions exist that would clearly have justified the director in refusing to grant a license had these facts or conditions been known to exist at the time the license was issued; or

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent of the licensee has been convicted of any felony, or of a misdemeanor involving any aspect of financial services, or a court has accepted a finding of guilt on the part of the licensee or partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent of the licensee of any felony, or of a misdemeanor involving any aspect of financial services; or

The licensee or any partner, officer, director, manager, member, control person, employee or agent of the licensee has had a license to conduct financial services, including a license substantially equivalent to a license under this act, revoked or suspended by any government agency; or

The licensee has filed an application for a license that as of the date the license was issued, or as of the date of an order denying, suspending or revoking a license, was incomplete in any material respect or contained any statement that was, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact; or

The mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee has failed to notify the director of the employment or termination of, or the entering into or termination of a contractual relationship with, a licensed mortgage loan originator pursuant to section 26-31-208(2), Idaho Code; or

The mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee has failed to supervise diligently and control the mortgage-related activities of a mortgage loan originator as defined in part 3 of this chapter and that is employed by the licensee; or

The licensee has failed to notify the director of the appointment or employment of a control person within thirty (30) days of such occurrence.

If the director finds that good cause exists for revocation of a license issued under this part, and that enforcement of this chapter and the public interest require immediate suspension of the license pending investigation, he may, after a hearing upon five (5) days’ written notice, enter an order suspending the license for no more than thirty (30) days.

Any mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee may relinquish its license by notifying the department in writing of its relinquishment, but this relinquishment shall not affect its liability for acts previously committed and may not occur after the filing of a complaint for revocation of the license.

The director may, in his discretion, reinstate a license issued under this part, terminate a suspension or grant a new license under this part to a person whose license issued under this part has been revoked or suspended, if no fact or condition then exists that clearly would justify the department in refusing to grant a license.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-207, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 7, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 7, p. 260.

§ 26-31-208. Records — Reports — Renewal and reinstatement of license.

Every licensee under this part shall maintain records in the United States, including financial records in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, in a manner that will enable the director to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this part. The recordkeeping system of the licensee shall be sufficient if it makes the required information reasonably available to the director. The records need not be kept in the place of business where residential mortgage loans are made, if the director is given free access to the records wherever located. The records pertaining to any loan need not be preserved for more than three (3) years after making the final entry relating to the loan.

Every mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensed under this part that employs or contracts with a mortgage loan originator licensed under part 3 of this chapter, for the purpose of conducting mortgage loan origination activities in Idaho, shall:

Notify the director through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, of the employment of, or contractual relationship with, a mortgage loan originator licensee within thirty (30) days of such employment or contract;

Notify the director through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, of the termination of employment of, or contractual relationship with, a mortgage loan originator licensee within thirty (30) days of such termination; and

Maintain any records relating to the employment of, or contractual relationship with, a mortgage loan originator licensee, for a period not to exceed three (3) years.

On or before December 31 of each year, every mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensee under this part shall pay through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, a nonrefundable annual license renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150), and file with the director through the NMLSR, or as otherwise prescribed by the director, a renewal application containing such information as the director may require. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-5254, Idaho Code, a license issued under this part automatically expires if not timely renewed according to the requirements of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-5254, Idaho Code, branch licenses issued under this part also expire upon the expiration, relinquishment or revocation of a license issued under this part to a licensee’s designated home office.

The director may reinstate an expired license during the time period of January 1 through February 28, immediately following license expiration if the director finds that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure under this part after submission to the director of:

A complete application for renewal;

The fees required to apply for license renewal unless previously paid for the period for which the license renewal applies; and

A reinstatement fee of two hundred dollars ($200).

Within forty-five (45) days of the end of each calendar quarter, each mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensee under this part shall submit quarterly mortgage call reports through the NMLSR, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the director may require.
(6) Within forty-five (45) days of the end of each calendar year, each mortgage broker and mortgage lender licensee under this part shall submit an annual report of financial condition through the NMLSR, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the director may require.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-208, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 8, p. 142.

§ 26-31-209. Examination and investigations.

The director shall examine periodically at intervals he deems appropriate, the loans and business records of each licensee under this part. In addition, for the purpose of discovering violations of the provisions of this part or securing information lawfully required pursuant to this part, the director may at any time investigate the loans, business, books and records of any such licensee. For these purposes, the director shall have free and reasonable access to the offices, places of business and books and records of the licensee. The director, for purposes of examination of licensees under this part, shall be paid the actual cost of examination by such licensee within thirty (30) days of the completion of the examination.

If the records of a licensee under this part are located outside of this state, the licensee shall have the option to make such records available to the director at a convenient location within this state, or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the director or his representative to examine such records at the place where they are maintained. The director may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect such records on his behalf.

For the purposes of this section, the director may administer oaths or affirmations, and upon his own motion or upon request of any party, may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, adduce evidence and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of any books, documents, or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

If the director has a reasonable basis to believe that an unlicensed person is engaging in activities for which a license is required under this part, then the director may subpoena the person or any employee, member, officer, representative or agent that has possession, custody or care of the books and records of the person to compel their attendance, adduce evidence and require the production of any matter that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

Upon failure to obey a subpoena or to give testimony and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the director may apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-209, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 9, p. 142.

§ 26-31-210. Restrictions on fees and charges.

A person subject to this part shall not require a borrower or person seeking a loan modification to pay any fees or charges prior to a residential mortgage loan closing, or prior to the completion of a loan modification, except:

Charges actually incurred by the person subject to this part on behalf of the borrower or person seeking a loan modification for services which have been rendered by third parties. These fees may include, but are not limited to, fees for credit reports, flood insurance certifications, property inspections, title insurance commitments, UCC-4 lien searches and appraisals;

An application fee;

A rate-lock fee;

A commitment fee upon approval of the residential mortgage loan;

A cancellation fee which may be charged and collected by a person subject to this part at any time either prior to the scheduled closing of a residential mortgage loan transaction, completion of a loan modification or subsequent thereto.

Any fees charged under the authority of this section must be reasonable and customary as to the type and the amount of the fee charged.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-210, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285.

§ 26-31-211. Prohibited practices of mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders.

No mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee under this part or person required under this part to have such license shall:

Obtain any exclusive dealing or exclusive agency agreement from any borrower;

Delay closing of any residential mortgage loan for the purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees or charges payable by the borrower;

Accept any fees at closing that were not previously disclosed fully to the borrower;

Obtain any agreement or instrument in which blanks are left to be filled in after signing by a borrower;

Engage in any misrepresentation or omission of a material fact in connection with a residential mortgage loan;

Make payment, whether directly or indirectly, of any kind to any in-house or fee appraiser for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of any residential real property that is to be covered by a residential mortgage loan;

Make any false promise likely to influence or persuade, or pursue a course of misrepresentations and false promises through mortgage loan originators or other agents or through advertising or otherwise;

Misrepresent, circumvent or conceal, through whatever subterfuge or device, any of the material terms of a residential mortgage loan transaction;

Enter into any agreement, with or without the payment of a fee, to fix in advance a particular interest rate or other term in a residential mortgage loan unless written confirmation of the agreement is delivered to the borrower as required by rule promulgated pursuant to this chapter and pertinent to this part;

Engage in mortgage loan origination activity through any person who at the time of such mortgage loan origination activity does not hold a mortgage loan originator license issued by the department or temporary authority pursuant to this chapter; or

Receive a fee for engaging in loan modification activities except pursuant to a written agreement between the person subject to this part and a person seeking a loan modification. The written agreement must specify the amount of the fee that will be charged to the person seeking a loan modification, specify the terms of the loan for which modification will be sought and disclose the expected impact of the loan modification on the monthly payment and length of the loan.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-211, as added by 2009, ch. 97, § 2, p. 285; am. 2013, ch. 64, § 10, p. 142; am. 2020, ch. 100, § 8, p. 260.

§ 26-31-212. Reserve accounts.

A mortgage lender shall, conspicuously and specifically, disclose to each borrower all contractual provisions relating to reserve accounts, impound accounts, escrow accounts, or any other account maintained for the borrower in order to pay for property taxes, property insurance, or private mortgage insurance.

Except as otherwise required by the truth in lending act, the real estate settlement procedures act, regulation X, or regulation Z, a mortgage lender shall not keep more than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the amounts necessary on an annual basis to pay expected insurance, taxes, or other agreed charges. Upon written notice by a borrower to the mortgage lender that reserves being required are excessive, the mortgage lender must, within thirty (30) days, either refund the excess or explain to the borrower why the amounts being required are believed to be reasonable and necessary. If, after notice of hearing under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the director determines that the reserve account, impound account, escrow account, or any other similar account maintained for a borrower is not reasonable, the director may order the mortgage lender to reduce its reserve requirements for such accounts. In any proceeding under this section, the burden shall be upon the mortgage lender to prove that the amounts required for such reserve accounts are based upon actual and reasonably anticipated charges.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-212, as added by 2020, ch. 100, § 9, p. 260.

§ 26-31-213. Annual statements.

A mortgage lender shall deliver to the borrower at least annually, during the month of January, a statement of the borrower’s account showing the date and amount of all payments made or credited to the account for the immediately preceding twelve (12) month period and the total unpaid balance. The statement shall also clearly describe in full the amounts received on all tax and insurance reserve accounts, the disposition of such funds, and the amounts held in reserve in such accounts. The statement shall clearly indicate any penalty or interest payments because of failure to pay taxes on time. A fee shall not be charged to the borrower for the statements.

A borrower may request additional statements from a mortgage lender at any time, and the mortgage lender may, unless otherwise prohibited by law, require a fee to provide each such statement. The statement shall be delivered to the borrower within thirty (30) days after receipt of a written request from the borrower.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-213, as added by 2020, ch. 100, § 10, p. 260.

§ 26-31-214. Notice of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided for in the truth in lending act, the real estate settlement procedures act, regulation X, or regulation Z, a mortgage lender shall provide notice to the borrower within fifteen (15) days after any sale or assignment of the borrower’s residential mortgage loan to another person wherein the mortgage lender does not retain the loan servicing. A mortgage lender purchasing or receiving assignment of a residential mortgage loan with servicing shall provide to the borrower within thirty (30) days a written statement describing policies relating to the reserve account.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-31-214, as added by 2020, ch. 100, § 11, p. 260.